Ohio, session 136, HB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 122.1710 be amended and sections 122.1712 and 122.1713 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 122.1710. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Low-income individual" has the same meaning as "low-income person" in section 122.66 of the Revised Code. (2) "Microcredential" has the same meaning as in section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (3) "OhioMeansJobs web site" has the same meaning as in section 6301.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Partially unemployed" and "totally unemployed" have the same meanings as in section 4141.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Training provider" means all of the following: (a) A state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) An Ohio technical center as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code; (c) A private business or institution that offers training to allow an individual to earn one or more microcredentials. (6) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of this state as specified in section 9.34 of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby created the individual microcredential assistance program to reimburse training providers for training costs for individuals to earn a microcredential. The department of development, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall administer the program. The director shall administer the program so that the total reimbursement to each training provider approved to participate in the program occurs at least once per fiscal year. (C) A training provider seeking to participate in the program shall submit an application to the director of development at the beginning or before the beginning of a fiscal year, but not later than the date established by the director. The training provider shall include in the application all of the following information: (1) The number of microcredentials the training provider will seek a reimbursement for and the names of the microcredentials; (2) The cost of the training for each microcredential; (3) The total amount of the reimbursement the training provider will seek; (4) The training provider's plan to provide opportunities for individuals who are low income, partially unemployed, or totally unemployed to participate in a training program and receive a microcredential; (5) Any other information the director requires. (D)(1) The director shall consider the following factors in determining whether to approve an application submitted under division (C) of this section: (a) The duration of the training program; (b) The cost of the training; (c) Whether approving an application will promote regional diversity in apportioning reimbursements uniformly across the state; (d) The training provider's commitment to providing opportunities for individuals who are low income, partially unemployed, or totally unemployed to participate in a training program and receive a microcredential. (2) In determining regional diversity under division (D)(1)(c) of this section, the director shall use the regions established under division (G) of section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (3) The director shall not approve an application submitted under this section if either of the following apply: (a) The microcredentials identified in the application are not included in the list the chancellor of higher education establishes under section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (b) The training provider has violated Chapter 4111. of the Revised Code within the four fiscal years immediately preceding the date of application. (4) The director shall notify a training provider in writing of the director's decision to approve or deny the training provider's application to participate in the program. (E) A participating training provider shall not charge an individual participating in a training program to earn a microcredential for which the training provider is seeking a reimbursement for either of the following: (1) Any costs associated with the individual's participation in the training program; (2) Any costs to the training provider resulting from an individual not completing the training program. (F)(1) Each participating training provider seeking reimbursement for training costs for one or more microcredentials earned by one or more individuals in a training program shall submit an application to the director after the individual or individuals have earned a microcredential. The training provider shall submit the reimbursement application during the fiscal year in which the training provider applied under division (C) of this section, but not later than the date established by the director. The training provider shall include in the reimbursement application all of the following information: (a) The actual cost for the training provider to provide each individual with the training; (b) Evidence that each individual earned a microcredential; (c) Any demographic information of each individual that the individual provides to the training provider, including race and gender. (2) The amount of the reimbursement shall be not more than three thousand dollars for each microcredential an individual receives. A participating training provider may not receive a reimbursement for any additional individual who earns a microcredential beyond the number of microcredentials included in the application under division (C) of this section. A participating training provider may receive a total reimbursement of five hundred thousand dollars in a fiscal year. However, each participating training provider that is a state institution of higher education may receive a total reimbursement or advance payment amount under section 122.1713 of the Revised Code of one million dollars in a fiscal year. (3) A training provider may request that an individual participating in the training provider's program provide demographic information to the training provider, including race and gender. An individual is not required to provide that information. (G) The director shall do both all of the following regarding the operation of the program: (1) Create an application to participate in the program and an application for reimbursement; (2) Create applications to participate in and seek advance payments under the platinum provider programs established under sections 122.1712 and 122.1713 of the Revised Code; (3) Create and distribute a survey to each individual who successfully earned a microcredential because of a reimbursement to a training provider under this section inquiring as to the individual's occupation and wages at the time of completing the survey. (H) The director shall include on the internet web site maintained by the department, and the governor's office of workforce transformation shall include on the office's internet web site and the OhioMeansJobs web site, all of the content created under division (G) of this section. (I) The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as the director considers necessary to implement this section and sections 122.1712 and 122.1713 of the Revised Code, including establishing priority guidelines for approving applications under division (D) of this section. (J) Any personal information of an individual the director receives in connection with the individual microcredential assistance program created under this section is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. However, the director may use the information as necessary to complete the reports required under section 122.1711 of the Revised Code. Sec. 122.1712. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of this state as specified in section 9.34 of the Revised Code. (2) "Individual microcredential assistance program" means the individual microcredential assistance program created under section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. (3) "Microcredential" has the same meaning as in section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (4) "Training provider" means both of the following: (a) An Ohio technical center as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code; (b) A private business or institution that offers training to allow an individual to earn one or more microcredentials. (B) The director of development, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall establish a platinum provider program. A training provider that is approved to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program and that meets the requirements specified under this section is eligible to participate in the platinum provider program. A training provider approved to participate in the platinum provider program may receive one or more advance payments to cover the training costs for individuals to earn a microcredential under the individual microcredential assistance program. (C) A training provider seeking to participate in the platinum provider program shall apply to the director on a form prescribed by the director after the training provider is approved to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program. The training provider shall include in the application all of the following information: (1) The advance payment amount the training provider is seeking, not to exceed twenty per cent of the total reimbursement amount the training provider seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code; (2) Evidence that at least eighty per cent of individuals who participated in training programs offered by the training provider in the previous fiscal year earned a microcredential under the individual microcredential assistance program; (3) The number of microcredentials for which the training provider is seeking an advance payment and the names of the microcredentials; (4) The cost of the training for each microcredential for which the training provider is seeking an advance payment; (5) Proof that the training provider has obtained a surety bond that meets the requirements of division (J) of this section. (D) The director shall notify a training provider in writing of the director's decision to approve or deny an application the training provider submits under division (C) of this section. If the director approves the application, the director shall do both of the following: (1) Designate the training provider as a platinum provider; (2) Provide an initial advance payment to the platinum provider in the amount specified in the application but not exceeding any of the amounts described under division (F) of this section. (E) After each training program that a platinum provider administers during a fiscal year that results in at least one individual earning a microcredential, the provider may apply for a subsequent advance payment of not more than the least of the amounts described under division (F) of this section. The provider shall include in the application the same information as described under division (C) of this section. If a provider applies for a subsequent advance payment under this division, one of the following applies depending on the training program's completion rate: (1) If at least eighty per cent of the individuals who participated in the training program earned a microcredential, the director shall provide a subsequent advance payment to the provider in the amount specified in the application. (2) If less than eighty per cent of the individuals who participated in the training program earned a microcredential, to be eligible for a subsequent advance payment, the provider shall refund to the director a certain per cent of the advance payment amount that was last provided to the provider during the fiscal year as determined under division (E)(2)(a) of this section. (a) The per cent a provider must refund to be eligible for a subsequent advance payment under division (E)(2) of this section is the difference between eighty per cent and the per cent of individuals who earned a microcredential. (b) For a provider to whom division (E)(2) of this section applies, if the provider complies with that division, the director shall provide a subsequent advance payment to the provider in the amount specified in the provider's application. If the provider does not comply with that division, the director shall not provide a subsequent advance payment. (F) In no case shall the director provide an advance payment under this section that exceeds the least of the following amounts: (1) Twenty per cent of the total amount of reimbursement the platinum provider seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code; (2) The amount of the provider's surety bond required by division (J) of this section, less any previous advance payment the provider is required to refund to the director under division (G) of this section, if the provider has not yet completed the refund; (3) One hundred thousand dollars. (G)(1) If the director approves a reimbursement application that a platinum provider submits under division (F) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code, the director shall reimburse the platinum provider for the total actual cost for the platinum provider to provide training to individuals who earned a microcredential in accordance with that division less the total advance payment amount provided to the platinum provider under this section. The director shall not reimburse the platinum provider for any amounts the platinum provider refunded to the director under division (E)(2) of this section. If the platinum provider specifies in the reimbursement application that the total actual cost for the platinum provider to provide the training is less than the total advance payment amount provided to the platinum provider under this section, the platinum provider shall refund to the director the difference between the advance payment amount and the actual training cost. (2) If a platinum provider fails to apply for reimbursement under division (F) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code, the director shall require the platinum provider to refund the total advance payment amount provided to the platinum provider under this section. (H) If, at the time a platinum provider seeks reimbursement under division (F) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code, the director determines that less than eighty per cent of individuals who participated in training programs provided by the platinum provider in the fiscal year earned a microcredential or that the platinum provider has failed to maintain the bond required under division (J) of this section, both of the following apply: (1) The director shall revoke the provider's status as a platinum provider; (2) The provider is ineligible to participate in the platinum provider program for the following fiscal year. (I) A training provider whose platinum status is revoked under division (H) of this section may reapply to participate in the platinum provider program in the fiscal year that follows the fiscal year in which the training provider is ineligible to participate in the program under that division. (J) A training provider that is certified as a platinum provider or that seeks to participate in the platinum provider program shall maintain a surety bond issued by a bonding company or an insurance company licensed to do business in this state. The bond shall be in favor of the director in an amount not less than the sum of the total advance payments received by the provider for the fiscal year plus any advance payments for previous fiscal years that the provider is required to refund under division (G) of this section, if the provider has not yet completed the refund. The provider shall maintain the bond for so long as it participates in the program and shall not allow it to expire or terminate until all of the provider's obligations under division (G) of this section are fulfilled. Sec. 122.1713. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of this state as specified in section 9.34 of the Revised Code. (2) "Individual microcredential assistance program" means the individual microcredential assistance program created under section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. (3) "Microcredential" has the same meaning as in section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (4) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of development, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall establish an institutional platinum provider program for state institutions of higher education approved to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program. (C) Each state institution of higher education shall do both of the following: (1) Provide at least two in-person training programs and at least one online training program for individuals to earn a microcredential; (2) Not later than the thirty-first day of December immediately after the effective date of this section, and not later than the thirty-first day of December of each year thereafter, apply to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program. (D) If the director approves a state institution of higher education's application to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program, all of the following apply: (1) The director shall designate the institution as an institutional platinum provider. (2) The institution may participate in the institutional platinum provider program established under this section. (3) The institution is eligible to apply for one or more advance payments under this section to cover training costs for individuals to earn a microcredential. (E) An institutional platinum provider may apply for an initial advance payment of not more than twenty per cent of the total reimbursement amount the institution seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. If an institution submits an application under this division, the director shall provide an advance payment to the institution in the amount specified in the application. (F) After each training program that an institutional platinum provider administers during a fiscal year that results in at least one individual earning a microcredential, the institution may apply for a subsequent advance payment of not more than twenty per cent of the total reimbursement amount the institution seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. If an institution applies for a subsequent advance payment under this division, one of the following applies depending on the training program's completion rate: (1) If at least fifty per cent of the individuals who participated in the training program earned a microcredential, the director shall provide a subsequent advance payment to the institution in the amount specified in the application. (2) If less than fifty per cent of the individuals who participated in the training program earned a microcredential, to be eligible for a subsequent advance payment, the institution shall refund to the director a certain per cent of the advance payment amount that was last provided to the institution during the fiscal year as determined under division (F)(2)(a) of this section. (a) The per cent an institution must refund to be eligible for a subsequent advance payment under division (F)(2) of this section is the difference between fifty per cent and the per cent of individuals who earned a microcredential. (b) For an institution to whom division (F)(2) of this section applies, if the institution complies with that division, the director shall provide a subsequent advance payment to the institution in the amount specified in the institution's application. If the institution does not comply with that division, the director shall not provide a subsequent advance payment. (G) In no case shall the total amount of the advance payments an institutional platinum provider receives under this section during any fiscal year exceed the total reimbursement amount the institution seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. (H) If the director approves a reimbursement application that an institutional platinum provider submits under division (F) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code, the director shall reimburse the institution in accordance with that division for the total actual cost for the institution to provide training to individuals who earned a microcredential less the total advance payment amount provided to the institution under this section. The director shall not reimburse the institution for any amounts the institution refunded to the director under division (F)(2) of this section. If the institution specifies in the reimbursement application that the total actual cost for the institution to provide the training is less than the total advance payment amount provided to the institution under this section, the institution shall refund to the director the difference between the advance payment amount and the actual training cost. Section 2. That existing section 122.1710 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Platinum Providers Act.